Washington statutes.
RCW 43.19.745

Agency use of envelopes—Standardization.

(1) The department shall consult with the office of financial management and state agencies to more efficiently manage the use of envelopes by standardizing them to the extent feasible given the business needs of state agencies.

(2) All state agencies with total annual average full-time equivalent staff that exceeds five hundred as determined by the office of financial management shall cooperate with the department in efforts to standardize envelopes under subsection (1) of this section. In the event that an agency is updating a mailing, the agency shall transition to an envelope recommended by the department, unless the office of financial management considers the change unfeasible.

(3) State agencies with five hundred total annual average full-time equivalent staff or less, as determined by the office of financial management, are encouraged to cooperate with the office to standardize envelopes under this section.

[ 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 314.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Purpose—2011 1st sp.s. c 43: See notes following RCW 43.19.003.